West Virginia, session 2026, SB614.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. ALLOCATION OF CUSTODIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND DECISION-MAKING RESPONSIBILITY OF CHILDREN. §48-9-102. Objectives; best interests of the child. (a) The primary objective of this article is to serve the child’s best interests, by facilitating:(1) Stability of the child;(2) Parental planning and agreement about the child’s custodial arrangements and upbringing;(3) Continuity of existing parent-child attachments;(4) Meaningful contact between a child and each parent;(5) Caretaking and parenting relationships by adults who love the child, know how to provide for the child’s needs, and who place a high priority on doing so;(6) Security from exposure to physical or emotional harm; (7) Expeditious, predictable decision-making and avoidance of prolonged uncertainty respecting arrangements for the child’s care and control; and(8) Meaningful contact between a child and his or her siblings, including half-siblings and step siblings.(b) A secondary objective of article is to achieve fairness between the parents.